lt-LT: Maitinimo bloko moduliškumas: Visiškai modulinis; Nemodulinis; Pusiau modulinis; Kita
zh-CN: 电源模块化: 全模组; 非模组; 半模组; 其他
pt-PT: Modularidade da fonte de alimentação: Totalmente modular; Não modular; Semi-modular; Outro
sv: Nätaggregatsmodularitet: Helt modulär; Icke-modulär; Halvmodulär; Övrigt
it: Modularità dell'alimentatore: Completamente modulare; Non modulare; Semi-modulare; Altro
zh-TW: 電源供應器模組化: 全模組化; 非模組化; 半模組化; 其他
nb: Strømforsyningsmodularitet: Fullt modulær; Ikke-modulær; Delvis modulær; Annet
ja: 電源のモジュール性: フルモジュラー; 非モジュラー; セミモジュラー; その他
cs: Modularita napájecího zdroje: Plně modulární; Nemodulární; Částečně modulární; Jiné
da: Strømforsyningsmodularitet: Fuldt modulært; Ikke-modulært; Semi-modulært; Andet
en: Power supply modularity: Fully modular; Non-modular; Semi-modular; Other
sk-SK: Modularita napájacieho zdroja: Plne modulárny; Nemodulárny; Čiastočne modulárny; Iné
tr: Güç kaynağı modülerliği: Tam modüler; Modüler değil; Yarı modüler; Diğer
th: ความเป็นโมดูลของแหล่งจ่ายไฟ: แบบมอดูลาร์เต็มรูปแบบ; ไม่ใช่มอดูลาร์; กึ่งมอดูลาร์; อื่นๆ
vi: Tính mô-đun của nguồn điện: Hoàn toàn mô-đun; Không mô-đun; Bán mô-đun; Khác
el: Αρθρωτότητα τροφοδοτικού: Πλήρως αρθρωτό; Μη αρθρωτό; Ημι-αρθρωτό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Modularidade da fonte de alimentação: Totalmente modular; Não modular; Semi-modular; Outro
ru: Модульность блока питания: Полностью модульный; Немодульный; Полумодульный; Другой
fi: Virtalähteen modulaarisuus: Täysin modulaarinen; Ei-modulaarinen; Puolimodulaarinen; Muu
nl: Modulariteit voeding: Volledig modulair; Niet-modulair; Semi-modulair; Andere
fr: Modularité de l’alimentation: Entièrement modulaire; Non modulaire; Semi-modulaire; Autre
de: Netzteil-Modularität: Vollmodular; Nicht modular; Teilmodular; Sonstiges
es: Modularidad de la fuente de alimentación: Totalmente modular; No modular; Semi modular; Otros
sl-SI: Modularnost napajalnika: Popolnoma modularen; Nemodularen; Polmodularen; Drugo
hu: Tápegység modularitása: Teljesen moduláris; Nem moduláris; Félig moduláris; Egyéb
ro-RO: Modularitate sursă de alimentare: Complet modular; Non-modular; Semi-modular; Altele
hr-HR: Modularnost napajanja: Potpuno modularno; Nemodularno; Polumodularno; Ostalo
pl: Modularność zasilacza: W pełni modularny; Niemodularny; Półmodularny; Inne
bg-BG: Модулност на захранването: Напълно модулен; Немодулен; Полумодулен; Други
ko: 전원 공급 장치 모듈성: 완전 모듈형; 비모듈형; 세미 모듈형; 기타